California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(b) Impose or threaten to impose reprisals on providers, to discriminate or threaten to discriminate against providers, or otherwise to interfere with, restrain, or coerce providers because of their exercise of rights guaranteed by this
 chapter.

(c) Refuse or fail to meet and confer in good faith with the Department of Human Resources or the Governor’s designee.

(d) Refuse to participate in good faith in the mediation procedure set forth in Section 10427.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10428.3.

(a) An unfair practice charge alleging that a political subdivision, a contractor, or a subcontractor has committed a violation of Section 10427.7, or an unfair practice charge alleging a violation of subdivision (c) of Section 10427.5 that is based on the conduct of a political subdivision, a contractor, or a subcontractor, shall commence only after all the following requirements have been met:

(1) A party alleging an unfair practice shall first provide notice to the Department of Human Resources of any alleged violation of Section 10427.7 by a political subdivision, a contractor, or a subcontractor, or any alleged violation of subdivision (c) of Section 10427.5 that is based on the conduct of a political subdivision, a contractor, or
 a subcontractor, and any facts supporting the alleged violation, within 30 calendar days of the date on which the party knew or reasonably should have known about the incident giving rise to the alleged violation.

(2) The department, or any state agency or department charged with the administration of state-funded early care and education programs, consistent with the advice and direction of the Department of Human Resources, shall work in good faith with the political subdivision, contractor, or subcontractor to cure the alleged violation within 60 calendar days of the postmarked notice from a provider, provider organization, or certified provider organization. State agencies or departments shall expedite, whenever possible, the resolution of alleged violations that have a financial impact on providers. If the political subdivision, contractor, or subcontractor cures the alleged violation, it shall send a written description of steps taken to
 the party alleging a violation within the 60-day period and to the department or the department charged with the administration of state-funded early care and education programs, as applicable, and to the Department of Human Resources.

(3) At the conclusion of the 60-day period, the party alleging an unfair practice may commence an unfair practice charge before the board consistent with Section 10428.5. In the board agent’s initial determination as to whether the charges of unfair practices establish a prima facie violation of Section 10427.5 or 10427.7, consistent with Section 10428.5 and applicable regulations, if the board agent determines the political subdivision, contractor, or subcontractor cured the alleged unfair practice during the 60-day period, the board shall dismiss the charge for failure to establish a prima facie violation.

(b) In any unfair practice charge before
 the board, the political subdivision, contractor, or subcontractor shall have the opportunity to be represented by a representative of its choice, but in no instance shall the state, the Department of Human Resources, the department, or any state agency charged with the administration of state-funded early care and education programs be obligated to provide representation to the political subdivision, contractor, or subcontractor before the board. However, the Department of Human Resources may intervene in any such proceedings before the board.

(c) In any violation of Section 10427.7 committed by a political subdivision, contractor, or subcontractor, as determined by the board, any monetary damage award or attorney fee award shall not be imposed upon the state, the Department of Human Resources, the department, or any other department or agency charged with the administration of a state-funded early care and education program, as defined in
 subdivision (f) of Section 10421.

(d) The state, the Department of Human Resources, the department, and any state agency charged with the administration of state-funded early care and education programs shall not be liable for an unfair labor practice committed by a political subdivision, contractor, or subcontractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10428.5.

(a) The powers and duties of the board described in Section 3541.3 of the Government Code, also apply, as appropriate, to this chapter. In implementing this chapter, the board shall rely on its existing regulations for the adjudication of unfair practice charges. The board may promulgate emergency regulations as necessary to effectuate its powers and duties under this chapter.

(b) The initial determination as to whether the charges of unfair practices are justified and, if so, what remedy is necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter, shall be a matter within the exclusive jurisdiction of the board, except that in an action to recover damages due to an unlawful strike, the board does not have authority to award
 strike-preparation expenses as damages, and does not have authority to award damages for costs, expenses, or revenue losses incurred during, or as a consequence of, an unlawful strike. Procedures for investigating, hearing, and deciding these cases shall be devised and promulgated by the board and shall include all the following:

(1) Any provider, provider organization, certified provider organization, the Department of Human Resources or the Governor’s designee, or the department, or any state agency, department, political subdivision, contractor, or subcontractor, charged with the administration of any state-funded early care and education program, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 10421, shall have the right to file an unfair practice charge, except that the board shall not do either of the following:

(A) Issue a complaint in respect of any charge based upon an alleged
 unfair practice occurring more than six months prior to the filing of the charge. This period may be tolled for the completion of the notice and cure requirements in Section 10428.3.

(B) Issue a complaint against conduct also prohibited by the provisions of the agreement between the parties until the grievance machinery of the agreement, if it exists and covers the matter at issue, has been exhausted, either by settlement or binding arbitration. However, when the charging party demonstrates that resort to contract grievance procedures would be futile, exhaustion shall not be necessary. The board has discretionary jurisdiction to review the settlement or arbitration award reached pursuant to the grievance machinery solely for the purpose of determining whether it is repugnant to the purposes of this chapter. If the board finds that the settlement or arbitration award is repugnant to the purposes of this chapter, it shall issue a complaint on the
 basis of a timely filed charge, and hear and decide the case on the merits. Otherwise, the board shall dismiss the charge. The board shall, in determining whether the charge was timely filed, consider the six-month limitation set forth in this subdivision to have been tolled during the time it took the charging party to exhaust the grievance machinery.

(2) The board does not have the authority to enforce agreements between the parties, and shall not issue a complaint on any charge based on alleged violation of any agreement that would not also constitute an unfair practice under this chapter.

(3) The board has the power to issue a decision and order directing an offending party to cease and desist from the unfair practice and to take such affirmative action as will effectuate the policies of this chapter.

(c) Any
 charging party, respondent, or intervenor aggrieved by a final decision or order of the board in an unfair practice case, except a decision of the board not to issue a complaint in such case, may petition for a writ of extraordinary relief from such decision or order.

(d) Such petition shall be filed in the district court of appeal in the appellate district where the unit determination or unfair practice dispute occurred. The petition shall be filed within 30 days after issuance of the board’s final order, order denying reconsideration, or order joining in the request for judicial review, as applicable. Upon the filing of such petition, the court shall cause notice to be served upon the board and thereupon shall have jurisdiction of the proceeding. The board shall file in the court the record of the proceeding, certified by the board, within 10 days after the clerk’s notice unless such time is extended by the court for good cause shown. The
 court shall have jurisdiction to grant to the board such temporary relief or restraining order it deems just and proper and in like manner to make and enter a decree enforcing, modifying, or setting aside the order of the board. The findings of the board with respect to questions of fact, including ultimate facts, if supported by substantial evidence on the record considered as a whole, are conclusive. The provisions of Title 1 (commencing with Section 1067) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to writs shall, except where specifically superceded herein, apply to proceedings commenced pursuant to this section.

(e) If the time to petition for extraordinary relief from a board decision has expired, the board may seek enforcement of any final decision or order in a district court of appeal or a superior court in the district where the unit determination or unfair practice case occurred. If, after hearing, the court determines that the
 order was issued pursuant to procedures established by the board and that the person or entity refused to comply with the order, the court shall enforce such order by writ of mandamus. The court shall not review the merits of the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10428.7.

(a) If online or group in-person preservice meetings or orientations are held for family child care providers by the state or a department, contractor, subcontractor, or political subdivision of the state, that entity shall provide a certified provider organization mandatory access to the entirety of those preservice meetings or orientations and the ability to make a presentation about the certified provider organization and its activities, its negotiations and memorandum of understanding, and membership at the preservice meeting or orientation trainings. The state or a department, contractor, subcontractor, or political subdivision of the state that is providing the preservice meeting or orientation shall notify the certified provider organization of its group in-person preservice meeting or
 orientation at least 10 days in advance of the preservice meeting or orientation, or, in the event that 10 days’ notice is not possible, as soon as the entity providing the preservice meeting or orientation has notice of the planned preservice meeting or orientation. If participation in a preservice meeting or orientation is limited to current providers, the date, time, and place of the preservice meeting or orientation shall not be disclosed to anyone other than the providers, the certified provider organization, or a vendor that is contracted to provide a service for purposes of the preservice meeting or orientation.

(b) The structure, time, and manner of certified provider organization access to preservice meetings or orientations held for providers by the state, or a department, contractor, subcontractor, or political subdivision of the state, are within the scope of representation as described in Section 10424.5. This section does not
 prohibit agreements between a certified provider organization and the Governor, or the Governor’s representative, that provide for preservice meetings or orientations that vary from the requirements of subdivision (a). If such an agreement is adopted as part of a memorandum of understanding pursuant to Section 10426, the requirements of this section shall not apply to the extent they are inconsistent with the agreement. In the absence of a mutual agreement regarding preservice meetings or orientations, all of the requirements of this section shall apply.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Group” means open to five or more providers or potential providers.

(2) “Orientation” means any presentation or meeting required for initial or continued participation in state-funded early care
 and education programs, any presentation or meeting where information required for participation in state-funded early care and education programs is communicated directly to providers or, if no such presentation or meeting is held in a county in a calendar month, the orientations required for license applicants as described in Section 1596.845 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10429.

(a) This section shall apply only if a provider organization has been certified pursuant to Section 10424.

(b) If the state, or a department, political subdivision, contractor, or subcontractor that administers a state-funded early care and education program chooses to disseminate mass communications to family child care providers or applicants for participation in state-funded early care and education programs concerning providers’ rights to join or support a provider organization or a certified provider organization, or to refrain from joining or supporting a provider organization or a certified provider organization, the Department of Human Resources or the Governor’s designee shall meet and confer with the certified provider
 organization concerning the content of the mass communication.

(c) If the state, or a department or political subdivision of the state that administers a state-funded early care or education program, is the entity sending a mass communication, and the Department of Human Resources and the certified provider organization do not agree on the content of the mass communication covered by this section, and if the state, or a department or political subdivision of the state, still chooses to disseminate the mass communication, the state, or a department or political subdivision of the state, shall distribute to the family child care providers, in addition to, and at the same time as, its own mass communication, a communication of reasonable length provided to the state, or a department or political subdivision of the state, by the certified provider organization. The certified provider organization shall provide the state, or a department or
 political subdivision of the state, with adequate copies of its own mass communication before distribution.

(d) This section does not apply to the distribution of a communication concerning provider rights that has been adopted for purposes of this section by the Public Employment Relations Board or the Department of Human Resources.

(e) For purposes of this section, a “mass communication” means a written document, or script for an oral or recorded presentation or message, that is intended for delivery to multiple providers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10429.5.

To effectuate the purposes of this chapter, any training partnership that is established as a joint labor-management committee pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10424.5. to make recommendations as to any professional development and training program agreed to through the meet and confer process described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 10424.5, shall consult with public entities, including, but not limited to, the Early Childhood Policy Council and its subcommittees, the department, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, and nonprofit entities, including the California Child Care Resource and Referral Network, First 5 California, and local First 5 commissions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 26. Direct Service Contract Procedure [10430. - 10437.]

10430.

The department shall develop an annual calendar identifying target dates for contract application deadlines, contract award announcements, contract approvals, and contract evaluations. Each calendar shall be available to the public and shall be updated at least annually.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10431.

The department shall develop and maintain a central distribution list for application announcements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10432.

Application announcements shall contain, but not be limited to, the following information: the goals and objectives of the program, identification of the specific minimum range of services to be purchased related to those goals, quantitative as well as qualitative measures which will be used by the department to evaluate service outcomes, specific criteria and a description of the methodology and timetable which will be followed to review and approve applications, and all minimum performance standards any agency is required to meet prior to direct service contract approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10433.

(a) The department shall include all of the following in the application announcement:

(1) The time estimated for each step.

(2) The specific staff names, office addresses, and telephone numbers for those responsible for each step.

(3) The legal requirements and signatory approvals required prior to final approval of any contract.

(4) Any conditions for advance payments shall also be identified.

(b) This information shall be provided in any application
 announcement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10434.

The department shall identify and transmit to all agencies awarded direct service contracts forms required for contract payments, management information or reports required pursuant to contract objectives, and conditions and methods for contract evaluations. Methods and conditions for payment recoveries, withholding of payments, and contract terminations relating to nonperformance shall also be identified. This information shall be provided in all cases prior to final approval of any direct service contract, unless the information is provided in the contract document.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10435.

The department shall develop a grievance procedure for resolving disputes arising from the awarding or administering of direct service contracts, in addition to the remedies provided under the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10436.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that greater efficiencies may be achieved in the execution of state-subsidized childcare and development program contracts with public and private agencies by the timely approval of contract provisions by the Department of Finance, the Department of General Services, and the department, and by authorizing the department to establish a multiyear application, contract expenditure, and service review, as may be necessary, to provide timely service while preserving audit and oversight functions to protect the public welfare.

(b) (1) The Department of Finance and the Department of General Services shall approve or disapprove annual contract funding terms and conditions, including both family fee
 schedules and rate schedules that are required to be adhered to by contract, and contract face sheets submitted by the department not more than 30 working days from the date of submission, unless unresolved conflicts remain between the Department of Finance, the department, and the Department of General Services. The department shall resolve conflicts within an additional 30-working day time period. Contracts and funding terms and conditions shall be issued to childcare contractors no later than June 1. Applications for new childcare funding shall be issued not more than 45 working days after the effective date of authorized new allocations of childcare moneys.

(2) If the market rate survey is used to set reimbursement rates, and notwithstanding paragraph (1), the department shall implement the regional market rate schedules based upon the county aggregates, as specified in Section 10374.5 and the annual Budget Act.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature to fully fund the third stage of childcare for former CalWORKs recipients.

(c) With respect to subdivision (b), it is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Finance annually review contract funding terms and conditions for the primary purpose of ensuring consistency between childcare contracts and the childcare budget. This review shall include evaluating any proposed changes to contract language or other fiscal documents to which the contractor is required to adhere, including those changes to terms or conditions that authorize higher reimbursement rates, modify related adjustment factors, modify administrative or other service allowances, or diminish fee revenues otherwise available for services, to determine if the change is necessary or has the potential effect of reducing the number of full-time equivalent children that may
 be served.

(d) If an alternative methodology, as defined in subdivision (ak) of Section 10213.5, is used to inform the setting of reimbursement rates for subsidized childcare, the department may contract to develop and conduct an alternative methodology to set reimbursement rates for subsidized childcare, subject to prior approval by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Administration for Children and Families, no less than every three years and no sooner than two years prior to the submission of the Child Care and Development Fund (CCDF) Plan. If the department does not use an alternative methodology and the market rate survey is used to set reimbursement rates, alternative payment programs, as set forth in
 Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10225), shall be subject to the rates established in the Regional Market Rate Survey of California Child Care Providers for provider payments, and the department shall contract to conduct a regional market rate survey once every three years, consistent with federal regulations, with a goal of completion by March 1.

(e) By March 1 of each year, the Department of Finance shall provide to the department the state median income amount for a four-person household in California using the methodology provided in subdivision (c) of Section 10271.5. The department shall adjust its fee schedule for childcare providers to reflect this updated state median income, and changes based on revisions to the state median income amount shall not be implemented midyear.

(f) Notwithstanding the June 1 date specified in subdivision (b), changes to the regional schedules and fee schedules may be made at any other time to reflect the availability of accurate data
 necessary for their completion, provided these documents receive the approval of the Department of Finance. The Department of Finance shall review the changes within 30 working days of submission and the department shall resolve conflicts within an additional 30-working day time period. Contractors shall be given adequate notice before the effective date of the approved schedules. It is the intent of the Legislature that contracts for services not be delayed by the timing of the availability of accurate data needed to update these schedules.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 25, Sec. 37.   (AB 150)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10437.

The department may execute a multiyear application process. Multiyear applications may only be submitted by public and private agencies that have been fully compliant in executing prior contracts for at least the preceding three fiscal years as evidenced by all of the following:

(a) No fiscal audit disclaimer.

(b) No program quality deficiencies.

(c) No contract compliance deficiencies.

(d) No incidents of child abuse or molestation.

(e) No program management, administrative, or staffing deficiencies.

(f) Any other criteria as may be deemed necessary to safeguard the public trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 27. Direct Service Contract Audit Requirements [10440. - 10441.]

10440.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Financial and compliance audit” means a systematic review or appraisal to determine each of the following:

(1) Whether the financial statements of an audited organization fairly present the financial position and the results of financial operations in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

(2) Whether the organization has complied with laws and regulations that may have a material effect upon the financial statements.

(b) “Public accountants” means certified public accountants, or state licensed public accountants.

(c) “Independent auditors” means public accountants who have no direct or indirect relationship with the functions or activities being audited or with the business conducted by any of the officials or contractors being audited.

(d) “Generally accepted auditing standards” means the auditing standards set forth in the financial and compliance element of the “Government Auditing Standards” issued by the Comptroller General of the United States and incorporating the audit standards of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants.

(e) “Direct service contract” means any contract with any public or private entity for child care and development programs, resource and referral programs, and programs contracting to provide support services as defined in Section 10213.5.

(f) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 which is exempt from taxation under Section 501(a) of that code, or any nonprofit, scientific, or educational organization qualified under Section 23701d of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(g) (1) Annually, there shall be a single independent financial and compliance audit of organizations that contract with the state under a direct service contract. Any such audit shall include an evaluation of the accounting and control systems of the direct service contractor and of the activities by the contractor to comply with the financial requirements of direct service contracts received by the contractor from the state agency. The financial and compliance requirements to be reviewed during the audit shall be those developed and published by the department
 in consultation with the Department of Finance. Audits carried out pursuant to this section shall be audits of the contractor rather than audits of individual contracts or programs. In the case of any contractor that receives less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per year from any state agency, the audit required by this section shall be conducted biennially, unless there is evidence of fraud or other violation of state law in connection with the direct service contract. The cost of the audit may be included in direct service contracts.

(2) The organization receiving funds from the state shall be responsible for obtaining the required financial and compliance audits of the organization and any subcontractors, except for direct service subcontracts and other subcontracts exempt from the department review, as agreed to by the Departments of Finance and General Services. The audits shall be made by independent auditors in accordance
 with generally accepted auditing standards. The audit shall be completed by the 15th day of the fifth month following the end of the contractor’s fiscal year. A copy of the required audit shall be filed with the department upon its completion. In the event an audit is not filed, the department shall notify the organization of the contract violation. The audit report filed shall be an integral part of the direct service contract file.

(h) (1) Nothing in this chapter limits the authority of the department to make audits of direct service contracts. However, if independent audits arranged for by direct service contractors meet generally accepted auditing standards, the department shall rely on those audits and any additional audit work shall build upon the work already done.

(2) Nothing in this chapter precludes the state from conducting, or contracting for the
 conduct of, contract performance audits which are not financial and compliance audits.

(3) Nothing in this chapter limits the state’s responsibility or authority to enforce state law or regulations, procedures, or reporting requirements arising pursuant thereto.

(4) Nothing in this chapter limits the responsibility of the department to provide an independent appeal procedure according to the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2) of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10441.

(a) Child development contractors are encouraged to develop and maintain a reserve within the child development fund, derived from earned but unexpended funds. Child development contractors may retain all earned funds. For purposes of this section, “earned funds” means those funds for which the required number of eligible service units have been provided.

(b) (1) Earned funds shall not be expended for activities proscribed by Section 10398. Earned but unexpended funds shall remain in the contractor’s reserve account within the child development fund and shall be expended only by direct service child development programs that are funded under contract with the department.

(2) A contractor may retain a reserve fund balance, separate from the reserve fund retained pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d), equal to 15 percent of the sum of the maximum reimbursable amounts of all contracts to which the contractor is a party, or two thousand dollars ($2,000), whichever is greater. This subparagraph applies to direct service child development contracting agencies that are funded under
 contract with the department.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), a contractor may retain a reserve fund balance for a resource and referral program, separate from the balance retained pursuant to subdivision (b) or (d), not to exceed 3 percent of the contract amount. Funds from this reserve account may be expended only by resource and referral programs that are funded under contract with the department.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), a contractor may retain a reserve fund balance for alternative payment model and certificate childcare contracts, separate from the reserve fund retained pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c). Funds from this reserve account
 may be expended only by alternative payment model and certificate
 childcare programs that are funded under contract with the department. The reserve amount allowed by this subdivision shall not exceed either of the following, whichever is greater:

(1) Eight percent of the sum of the parts of each contract to which that contractor is a party that is allowed for administration pursuant to Section 10302 and that is allowed for supportive services pursuant to the
 contract.

(2) One thousand dollars ($1,000).

(e) Each contractor’s audit shall identify any funds earned by the contractor for each contract through the provision of contracted services in excess of funds expended.

(f) Any interest earned on reserve funds shall be included in the fund balance of the reserve. This reserve fund shall be maintained in an interest-bearing account.

(g) Moneys in a contractor’s reserve fund may be used only for expenses that are reasonable and necessary costs as defined in subdivision (n) of Section 10213.5.

(h) Any reserve fund balance in excess of the amount authorized pursuant to subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) shall be returned to the department
 pursuant to procedures established by the department.

(i) Upon termination of all child development contracts between a contractor and the department, all moneys in a contractor’s reserve fund shall be returned to the department pursuant to procedures established by the department.

(j) Expenditures from, additions to, and balances in, the reserve fund shall be included in the contracting agency’s annual financial statements and audit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 62, Sec. 26.   (AB 210)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 30. Child Care and Development Facilities Capital Outlay [10470. - 10475.]

10470.

It is the intent of the Legislature that funds be appropriated for capital outlay for purposes of providing facilities for child care and development services provided pursuant to this part, including, but not limited to, all of the following purposes:

(a) For the purchase of relocatable facilities by the state for lease to qualifying contracting agencies in areas with no available economically practical or feasible child care and development facilities.

(b) For renovation and repair of child care and development facilities in order to comply with state and local health and safety standards and licensing requirements, without unnecessarily increasing the value of the facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10471.

(a) All of the following child care and development programs, other than those providing extended day care services, shall be eligible to receive a loan for the renovation and repair of facilities used for the program or to lease relocatable facilities to be used for the program:

(1) Private nonprofit child care and development programs currently, or soon to be, under contract with the department pursuant to Section 10268.5.

(2) Child care and development programs operated by, or in a facility owned by, a public entity.

(b) A recipient of a loan pursuant to this section shall document that the renovated
 facility shall comply with all laws and regulations applicable to child care facilities provided for pursuant to Chapter 3.4 (commencing with Section 1596.70) and Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 1596.90) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) A recipient of a loan pursuant to this section shall assure the board that the renovated facility shall be used for the purposes of the child care and development program for the entire loan period, which shall be determined by the board as follows:

(1) For loans equal to or less than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), not less than three years.

(2) For loans exceeding thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), the loan period shall increase one year for each additional ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or part thereof, to a maximum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(d) Interest on the loan principal shall be charged at a rate equal to the rate earned by the Pooled Money Investment Account.

(e) In the event that a recipient ceases to use the renovated facility for purposes of the child care and development program prior to the expiration of the loan period, the board shall collect the entire outstanding balance of the loan, plus interest, notwithstanding the loan period originally set pursuant to subdivision (c), unless the board deems it appropriate to waive repayment at that time.

(f) If the renovated facility has been continuously used for purposes of the child care and development program for the entire loan period, the board shall waive repayment of the amount of the loan principal, plus interest, at the end of the loan period.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10472.

(a) There is hereby created in the State Treasury the State Child Care Capital Outlay Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the State Child Care Capital Outlay Fund, including moneys deposited in that fund from any source whatsoever, shall be continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal year for expenditure pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. The fund shall be administered by the State Allocation Board, which may authorize the expenditure of any moneys in the fund for capital outlay projects pursuant to Section 10307 or this chapter. Funds in the State Child Care Facilities Fund set aside for the purposes of providing extended day care facilities pursuant to Section 8477 shall be transferred to the State Child Care Capital Outlay Fund upon the effective
 date of the act amending this section in the 1997–98 Regular Session.

(b) The department shall establish the qualifications to determine the eligibility of child care and development agencies, including those that provide preschool and extended day care services, to lease relocatable facilities under this section.

(c) Although primary use of relocatable facilities shall be for child care and development programs, including preschool and extended day care programs, those facilities may be used for other purposes if the following conditions are met:

(1) The alternative use of the facility does not infringe upon the accessibility of child care and development programs including preschool or extended day care programs.

(2) The department authorizes
 alternative use as being compatible with child care and development programs, including preschool or extended day care programs.

(d) The State Allocation Board, with the advice of the department, may do all of the following:

(1) Establish any procedures and policies in connection with the administration of this section that it deems necessary.

(2) Adopt any rules and regulations for the administration of this section requiring those procedures, forms, and information that it deems necessary.

(3) Have constructed, furnished, equipped, or otherwise require whatever work is necessary to place relocatable facilities for child care and development services, including preschool and extended day care services where needed.
